Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.340

Registration of foreign corporation—Right to conduct affairs in the state.

(1) No foreign corporation shall have the right to conduct affairs in this state until it registers with the secretary of state in accordance with the requirements of Article 5 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

(2) A nonexhaustive list of activities that do not constitute conducting affairs in this state is provided in RCW 23.95.520.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4117; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 68.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.